src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Dagbani language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
+Pron+Pers: Personal ;
+Pron+Pers+Emph: Emphatic ;
+Pron+Recipr: Reciprocal ;
+Pron+Refl:maŋa # ; ! The rest under Personal
+Pron+Dem: Demonstrative ;

LEXICON Personal
! Preverbal pronouns serve as subjects of a verb
+Sg1:n Reflexive ;
+Sg2:a Reflexive ;
+Sg3+Anim:o Reflexive ;
+Sg3+Inan:di Reflexive ;
+Pl1:ti Reflexive ;
+Pl2:yi Reflexive ;
+Pl3+Anim:bɛ Reflexive ;
+Pl3+Inan:di Reflexive ;
+Pl3+Inan:ŋa Reflexive ;

! Postverbal pronouns usually denote objects
+Sg1:ma # ;
+Sg2:a # ;
+Sg3+Anim:o # ;
+Sg3+Inan:li # ;
+Pl1:ti # ;
+Pl2:ya # ;
+Pl3+Anim:ba # ;
+Pl3+Inan:li # ;
+Pl3+Inan:ŋa # ;

LEXICON Emphatic
+Sg1:mani # ;
+Sg2:nyini # ;
+Sg3+Anim:ŋuni # ;
+Sg3+Anim:ŋuna # ;
+Sg3+Inan:dini # ;
+Sg3+Inan:dina # ;
+Pl1:tinima # ;
+Pl2:yinima # ;
+Pl3+Anim:bɛna # ;
+Pl3+Anim:bana # ;
+Pl3+Inan:ŋana # ;


LEXICON Reciprocal
taba # ;

LEXICON Reflexive
# ; ! These are the plain pronouns
+Refl:/%-maŋa # ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
+Dem+Prox+Sg:ŋɔ # ;
+Dem+Dist+Sg:ŋɔ% há # ;
+Dem+Prox+Pl:ŋɔnímá # ;
+Dem+Dist+Pl:ŋɔnímá% há # ; 

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
